da: Tåstil for strømpebukser: Lukket tå; Åben tå; Forstærket tå; Sandaltå; Tå med søm; Uden tå; Andet
es: Estilo de puntera de medias: Punta cerrada; Punta abierta; Punta reforzada; Punta para sandalia; Punta con costura; Sin punta; Otro
hr-HR: Stil čarapa s prstima: Zatvoreni prsti; Otvoreni prsti; Ojačani prsti; Sandal prsti; Prsti sa šavom; Bez prstiju; Ostalo
it: Stile della punta della calzetteria: Punta chiusa; Punta aperta; Punta rinforzata; Punta nuda; Punta con cucitura; Senza punta; Altro
pt-PT: estilo de ponta de meia: Biqueira fechada; Biqueira aberta; Biqueira reforçada; Biqueira de sandália; Biqueira com costura; Sem biqueira; Outro
fr: Style de pointe de l’article de bonneterie: Bout fermé; Bout ouvert; Bout renforcé; Bout invisible; Bout avec couture; Sans pointe; Autre
fi: Sukkahousujen varvastyyli: Umpikärki; Avokärki; Vahvistettu kärki; Sandaalikärki; Saumattu kärki; Kärjetön; Muu
pt-BR: Meia estilo da ponta: Ponteira fechada; Ponteira aberta; Ponteira reforçada; Ponteira para sandália; Ponteira com costura; Sem ponteira; Outro
tr: Çorap burun tipi: Kapalı burun; Açık burun; Güçlendirilmiş burun; Sandalet burnu; Dikişli burun; Burunsuz; Diğer
zh-TW: 襪類腳趾樣式: 包頭; 露趾; 加固腳趾; 涼鞋適用腳趾; 有縫線腳趾; 無腳趾; 其他
lt-LT: Kojinių pirštų dalies stilius: Uždaras priekis; Atviras priekis; Sutvirtintas priekis; Basutėms pritaikytas priekis; Priekis su siūle; Be priekio; Kita
sl-SI: Stil prstnega dela nogavic: Zaprti prsti; Odprti prsti; Ojačani prsti; Sandal prsti; Šivani prsti; Brez prstov; Drugo
pl: Styl palców w wyrobach pończoszniczych: Kryte palce; Odkryte palce; Wzmocnione palce; Do sandałów; Palce ze szwem; Bez palców; Inne
de: Zehenstil der Strumpfwaren: Geschlossene Zehenpartie; Offene Zehenpartie; Verstärkte Spitze; Transparente Spitze; Zehennaht; Zehenfrei; Sonstiges
vi: Kiểu mũi tất: Bít mũi; Hở mũi; Mũi gia cố; Mũi đi sandal; Mũi có đường may; Không mũi; Khác
sk-SK: Štýl špičky pančúch: Uzavretá špička; Otvorená špička; Zosilnená špička; Sandálová špička; Šitá špička; Bez špičky; Iné
el: Στυλ μύτης καλσόν / καλτσών: Κλειστή μύτη; Ανοιχτή μύτη; Ενισχυμένη μύτη; Μύτη σανδαλιού; Μύτη με ραφή; Χωρίς μύτη; Άλλο
cs: Styl špičky punčochového zboží: Uzavřená špička; Otevřená špička; Zesílená špička; Špička do sandálů; Špička se švem; Bez špičky; Ostatní
hu: Harisnya orrkialakítása: Zárt orrú; Nyitott orrú; Megerősített orrú; Szandálorrú; Varrt orrú; Orr nélküli; Egyéb
zh-CN: 袜尖款式: 包趾; 露趾; 脚趾加固; 透明脚尖; 有缝脚尖; 无趾; 其他
th: สไตล์ปลายเท้าถุงน่อง: หุ้มปลายเท้า; เปิดปลายเท้า; เสริมความหนาปลายเท้า; ปลายเท้าแบบโปร่ง; ปลายเท้าแบบมีตะเข็บ; เปลือยปลายเท้า; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип носочной части чулочно-носочных изделий: Закрытый мысок; Открытый мысок; Усиленный мысок; Прозрачный мысок; Мысок со швом; Без мыска; Другое
ko: 스타킹 발가락 스타일: 클로즈드 토; 오픈 토; 보강 토; 샌들 토; 솔기 있는 토; 발가락 트임; 기타
en: Hosiery toe style: Closed toe; Open toe; Reinforced toe; Sandal toe; Seamed toe; Toeless; Other
nb: Strømpebukse med tåstil: Lukket tå; Åpen tå; Forsterket tå; Sandaltå; Tå med søm; Uten tå; Annet
sv: Tåstil för strumpor: Stängd tå; Öppen tå; Förstärkt tå; Sandaltå; Sydd tå; Tålös; Övrigt
nl: Kousen teen stijl: Dichte neus; Open neus; Versterkte neus; Sandaalneus; Neus met naad; Zonder neus; Overig
ja: ストッキングのつま先スタイル: クローズドトゥ; オープントゥ; 補強トゥ; サンダルトゥ; シームドトゥ; トウレス; その他
bg-BG: Стил на пръстите на чорапогащника: Затворени пръсти; Отворени пръсти; Подсилени пръсти; За сандали; Пръсти с ръб; Без пръсти; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul de finisare al vârfului ciorapului: Vârf închis; Vârf decupat; Vârf întărit; Vârf invizibil; Vârf cu cusătură; Fără vârf; Altele